test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-tuoistwnz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - -tuoistõnz: # quantifiers 164 'eng /est -teistkümnes/fin' - full paradigm
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: -tuoistõnz
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: -tuoistõnd
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: -tuoistõndt
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: -tuoistõndõn
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: -tuoistõndõks
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: -tuoistõndõ
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: -tuoistõndõst
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: -tuoistõndõd
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: -tuoistõndõd
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: -tuoistõndidi
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: -tuoistõndõdõn
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: -tuoistõndõdõks
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: -tuoistõndiž
     -tuoistõnz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: -tuoistõndist
